Massachusetts, session 194th, H678.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of chapter 70 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking
the definition of “Foundation allotments” and inserting in place thereof the following new
definition:-
“Foundation allotments”, the sum of the foundation category costs for each district;
provided, however, that the sum in each foundation category shall be the product of enrollment
in each foundation enrollment category that is eligible for the respective foundation category and
the per-pupil rate assigned to each foundation category; provided further, that in each year the
per-pupil rate for each foundation category, except employee benefits and fixed charges, shall
not be less than the foundation per-pupil rate in section 3 of this chapter adjusted by the
foundation inflation index; and provided further, that in each year the rate for employee benefits
and fixed charges shall not be less than the prior year's rate adjusted by the foundation employee
benefits inflation rate.
of 2

SECTION 2: Said section 2 of chapter 70 is hereby further amended by striking the
definition of “Foundation inflation index” and inserting in place thereof the following new
definition:-
“Foundation inflation index”, the ratio of the value of the implicit price deflator for state
and local government consumption expenditures and gross investment in the first quarter of the
prior fiscal year to the value of that same deflator in the first quarter of fiscal year two thousand
and nineteen; provided that the increase in the index over the prior fiscal year shall not exceed
four-and-one-half percent.
of 2